Georgia, session 2025_26, HB462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Toombs County shall be and is authorized to exercise all redevelopment and other powers
provided for under Chapter 44 of Title 36 of the O.C.G.A., the "Redevelopment Powers
Law," as amended. The intention of this Act is to authorize Toombs County to undertake and
carry out community redevelopment, to create tax allocation districts, to issue tax allocation
bonds, and to incur other obligations within the meaning of and as fully permitted under the
provisions of Article IX, Section II, Paragraph VII(b) of the Constitution of the State of
Georgia of 1983, as amended, and to authorize Toombs County to exercise redevelopment
powers as fully as the "Redevelopment Powers Law" may now or hereafter permit and not
to limit any redevelopment powers permitted under the "Redevelopment Powers Law."
H. B. 462
- 1 -

LC 61 0070/AP
SECTION 2.
The election superintendent of Toombs County shall call and conduct an election, as
provided in this section, for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of Toombs
County for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct that election on
the Tuesday after the first Monday in November, 2025, and shall issue the call and conduct
that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent shall cause the date and
purpose of the election to be published once at least 90 days immediately preceding the date
thereof and once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official
organ of Toombs County. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which authorizes Toombs County to exercise all
( ) NO redevelopment powers allowed under the 'Redevelopment Powers Law,' as
it may be amended from time to time?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, then Section 1 of this Act shall become of full
force and effect immediately. If this Act is not so approved or if the election is not
conducted as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective and
this Act shall be automatically repealed on the first day of January immediately following
such election date. The expense of such election shall be borne by Toombs County. It shall
be the election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State.
SECTION 3.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 2 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 462
- 2 -